Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Alaska Commission on Aging.

Sec. 47.45.200.
Alaska Commission on Aging.

The Alaska Commission on Aging is established in the Department of Health and Social Services. The members of the commission include

the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development or the commissioner’s designee;

a senior services provider, regardless of age, appointed by the governor;

the chair of the Alaska Pioneers’ Homes Advisory Board under AS

44.29.500

; and

seven persons selected on the basis of their knowledge and demonstrated interest in the concerns of older Alaskans, appointed by the governor in accordance with (b) of this section.

After requesting from senior citizens’ organizations the names of persons who are qualified for and interested in serving on the commission, the governor shall appoint the members of the commission under (a)(5) of this section. Appointments shall be made by the governor to assure representation of low-income persons and minorities, and representation from rural and urban areas of the state, and to secure statewide geographical representation on the commission. At least six of the persons appointed by the governor shall be 60 years of age or older. At least two of these persons shall be 65 years of age or older. Each member appointed by the governor shall be a resident of the state.

The persons appointed under (a)(3) and (a)(5) of this section serve overlapping four-year terms, and serve at the pleasure of the governor. A member may be reappointed, but a member appointed under (a)(3) or (a)(5) of this section may not serve more than two consecutive terms or eight consecutive years, whichever is longer.

If a person appointed under (a)(3) or (a)(5) of this section fails to attend three consecutive meetings of the commission, a majority of the members of the commission may request the governor to terminate the membership of the member and to fill the vacancy.

A vacancy in the membership of persons appointed under (a)(3) and (a)(5) of this section shall be filled by appointment by the governor. The person appointed serves for the unexpired portion of the term.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 60 (2003); am §§ 1 — 4 ch 92 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.44.200.
Renumbered in 2003.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective August 20, 2005, rewrote paragraph (a)(3), which read “the commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee”; and inserted paragraph references in subsections (c)-(e).

Sec. 47.45.210.
Meetings and officers.

The commission shall meet at the call of the chair, at the request of a majority of the members, or at a regularly scheduled time as determined by a majority of the members. The commission shall meet at least four times each year.

A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for conducting business and exercising the powers of the commission.

The commission shall elect one of its members as chairperson, and may select other officers it considers necessary.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 60 (2003); am § 5 ch 92 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.44.210. Renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

47.45.200

” was substituted for “AS 47.44.200” to conform to the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.44.200.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective August 20, 2005, in subsection (b) deleted the first sentence, which read “The members of the commission listed in AS

47.45.200(a)(2)

and (3) may not vote on matters before the commission” and deleted “listed in AS

47.45.200(a)(1)

, (4), and (5)” following “members of the commission.”

Sec. 47.45.220.
Compensation.

Members of the commission receive no compensation for their services, but are entitled to per diem and travel allowances authorized by law for other boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 60 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.44.220. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 47.45.230.
Executive director.

The executive director of the commission shall formulate and submit to the department a comprehensive statewide plan that identifies the concerns and needs of older Alaskans and present that plan to the commission.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 60 (2003); am § 3 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.44.225. Renumbered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, deleted the paragraph (1) designation, deleted paragraphs (2) and (3), relating to the administration of certain federal and state programs, and inserted “and submit to the department.”

Sec. 47.45.240.
Powers, duties, and limitations.

The commission shall

subject to review by the department, approve a comprehensive statewide plan that identifies and addresses the concerns and needs of older Alaskans and, with reference to the approved plan, prepare and submit to the governor and legislature an annual analysis and evaluation of the services that are provided to older Alaskans;

make recommendations directly to the governor and the legislature with respect to legislation, regulations, and appropriations for programs or services that benefit older Alaskans;

encourage the development of municipal commissions serving older Alaskans and community-oriented programs and services for the benefit of older Alaskans;

employ an executive director who serves at the pleasure of the commission;

help older Alaskans lead dignified, independent, and useful lives;

request and receive reports and audits from state agencies and local institutions concerned with the conditions and needs of older Alaskans;

give assistance, on request, to the senior housing office in the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation in administration of the senior housing loan program under AS

18.56.710

—

18.56.799

and in the performance of the office’s other duties under AS

18.56.700

; and

provide to the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority, for its review and consideration, recommendations concerning the integrated comprehensive mental health program for persons who are described in (d) of this section and the use of the money in the mental health trust settlement income account in a manner consistent with regulations adopted under AS

47.30.031

.

To accomplish its duties, the commission may

review, evaluate, and comment upon state programs concerned with the problems and the needs of older Alaskans;

collect facts and statistics, and make studies of conditions and problems pertaining to the employment, health, housing, financial security, social welfare, and other concerns that bear upon the well-being of older Alaskans;

provide information about public programs that would be of interest or benefit to older Alaskans;

appoint special committees, which may include persons who are not members of the commission, to complete necessary studies;

promote community education efforts regarding the problems and concerns of older Alaskans;

contract for necessary services;

consult and cooperate with persons, organizations, and groups interested in or concerned with programs of assistance to older Alaskans;

advocate improved programs of benefit to older Alaskans; and

recommend standards for levels of services for older Alaskans for programs administered by the department.

The commission may not investigate, review, or undertake any responsibility for the longevity bonus program under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

or the Alaska Pioneers’ Home or Alaska Veterans’ Home under AS 47.55.

When the commission formulates a comprehensive statewide plan under (a) of this section, it shall include within the plan specific reference to the concerns and needs of older Alaskans who have a disorder described in AS

47.30.056(b)(4)

.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 60 (2003); am § 14 ch 59 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 92 SLA 2005; am §§ 4, 5 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.44.230. Renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

” was substituted for “AS 47.44.200 — 47.44.240” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.44.200 — 47.44.240, and “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “AS 47.45” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, inserted “or Alaska Veterans’ Home” in subsection (c), and made stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment, effective August 20, 2005, deleted “and evaluate grant applicants and award grants under those programs” from the end of former paragraphs (a)(7) and (a)(8).

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, inserted “subject to review by the department” and “and addresses” in paragraph (a)(1), deleted paragraphs (a)(7) and (a)(8), relating to setting policy for certain federal and state programs, substituted “recommend” for “set” and “commission” for “department” in paragraph (b)(9), deleted paragraph (b)(10), relating to the adoption of regulations, and made related changes.

Sec. 47.45.290.
Definitions.

In AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

,

“commission” means the Alaska Commission on Aging;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“older Alaskan” means a resident who is 60 years of age or older.

History.

(E.O. No. 108 § 60 (2003); am § 6 ch 34 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.44.240. Renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

” was substituted for “AS 47.44.200 — 47.44.240” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.44.200 — 47.44.240. Paragraph (2) was enacted as (3); renumbered in 2008, at which time paragraph (2) was renumbered as (3).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective August 20, 2008, added paragraph (3) [now (2)].